South Dakota, session 2026, SB169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17H:
Any health carrier that makes determinations or provides advice about third-party
payment for any health care services using an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other
software tool, for the purpose of utilization review and any health carrier that contracts
with or otherwise works through an entity that uses an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or
other software tool, for the purpose of utilization review, shall ensure the following:
(1) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool bases its determination
on the following information, as applicable:
(a) A patient’s medical or other clinical history;
(b) Individual clinical circumstances, as presented by the requesting provider;
and
(c) Other relevant clinical information contained in the patient’s medical or
other clinical record;
(2) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not base its
determination solely on a group dataset;
(3) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool is applied equally for all
patients, including in accordance with any applicable regulations and guidance
issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services; and
(4) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool is configured and
applied in a standard consistent manner for all subscriber groups and individuals
covered by a health benefit plan, as defined in § 58-17-66, so that the resulting
decisions are the same for all patients with similar clinical presentations and
considerations.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.253.19 2 169
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17H:
An artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool used for the purpose of
utilization review pursuant to section 1 of this Act may not deny, delay, or modify a
determination to provide health care services. Any adverse determination may be made
only by a licensed physician or a licensed healthcare professional competent to evaluate
the specific clinical issues involved in the requested services, and only after reviewing and
considering the requesting provider’s recommendation, the patient’s medical or other
clinical history as applicable, and individual clinical circumstances.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17H:
Any health carrier that makes determinations or provides advice about third-party
payment for any health care services using an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other
software tool for the purpose of utilization review or that contracts with or otherwise works
through an entity that uses an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool for
the purpose of utilization review shall compile an annual report detailing how, during the
preceding fiscal year, the artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool was used
in the utilization review process and the nature and degree of human review and oversight
that was used to afform or negate any determinations.
The report must be forwarded to the Executive Board of the Legislative Research
Council on or before December first of each year.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17H:
The Division of Insurance may, at any time, inspect a health carrier's automated
system to ensure that the health carrier's use of artificial intelligence, algorithms, or other
software tools is in compliance with sections 1 and 2 of this Act.
If the division determines that the automated system is not in compliance, the
division shall notify the attorney general who may direct the health carrier to cease and
desist from engaging in further noncompliant activities.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.